New York, session 2025-2026, A7601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 383 of the laws of 1991, relating to 2 the incorporation of the New York Zoological Society, as amended by 3 section 1 of item QQQ of subpart B of part XXX of chapter 58 of the laws 4 of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 6 section two of this act shall take effect December 31, [2025] 2030. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10367-01-5